Georgia statutes. 
When it appeared that an election was held on Saturday, January 23, and that notice thereof had been published in the proper newspaper once a week for six weeks, beginning on Friday, December 18, and ending on Friday, January 22, since the notice was inserted the first time at least 30 days before the date of the election and as nearly that precise number of days immediately preceding such date as was possible under the circumstances, the fact that the publication began more than 30 days prior to such date was immaterial and afforded taxpayers no cause for attacking the validity of the notice. Clark v. Union Sch. Dist., 36 Ga. App. 80, 135 S.E. 318 (1926).

Publication of Act does not comply with requirements as to notice. - Fact that a local Act was published before the day of the election, and that the notice prescribed the amount of the bonds, the interest thereon, and when the bonds were to be paid off, was not a sufficient compliance with this section; nor was the fact that, out of 189 voters, only 17 voted against the measure, a sufficient answer to the illegality of the notice. Bowen v. Mayor of Greenesboro, 79 Ga. 709, 4 S.E. 159 (1887).

Notice affecting custodian of funds. - Bank as custodian of the proceeds of county bonds is chargeable with the notice given under this section as to the purpose of the bond issue and must not permit the funds to be used for other purposes. Bank of Chatsworth v. Hagedorn Constr. Co., 162 Ga. 488, 134 S.E. 310 (1926).

Ordinance not meeting requirements of this section void. Allen v. City of Atlanta, 166 Ga. 28, 142 S.E. 262 (1928).

Reduction of amount before validation. - When the election was regular as to all the requirements except that the amount exceeded the constitutional limit, the judge erred in reducing the amount of the bonds issued to a sum within such limit and then declaring the issuance of such bonds would be allowed. Berrien County v. Paulk, 150 Ga. 829, 105 S.E. 491 (1920).

When petition did not present question whether notice was illegal because amount was unconstitutional, injunction would not lie to restrain the authorities from issuing a less and proper amount. Heilbron v. Mayor of Cuthbert, 96 Ga. 312, 23 S.E. 206 (1895).

When intervenors did not raise point that bonds were in excess of constitutional limit the intervenors' cannot, in the intervenors' bill of exceptions, assign this as error. Sewell v. City of Tallapoosa, 145 Ga. 19, 88 S.E. 577 (1916).

Amount of interest. - Specifying that interest is to be paid annually is not sufficient; failure to specify the amount to be paid renders the notice defective. Mayor of Athens v. Hemerick, 89 Ga. 674, 16 S.E. 72 (1892); Mayor of Perry v. Norwood, 99 Ga. 300, 25 S.E. 648 (1896); City of Thomasville v. Thomasville Elec. Light & Gas Co., 122 Ga. 399, 50 S.E. 169 (1905).

Exact gross sum of interest not necessary. - It is not essential to the validity of the notice that the notice should state the precise gross sum, in dollars and cents, to be annually paid as interest; the facts actually stated furnishing a basis by which a calculation could be easily and readily made showing the exact amount of interest to be paid. Ponder v. Mayor of Forsyth, 96 Ga. 572, 23 S.E. 498 (1895).

Notice need not specify price of bonds. - Notice is not invalid because the price at which the bonds are to be sold is not stated therein. Wimberly v. County of Twiggs, 116 Ga. 50, 42 S.E. 478 (1902).

Notice silent as to collection of annual tax. - Fact that the notice of the bond election was silent as to the collection of the annual tax affords no reason why the bonds should not be validated. Woodall v. Town of Adel, 122 Ga. 301, 50 S.E. 102 (1905); Oliver v. City of Elberton, 124 Ga. 64, 52 S.E. 15 (1905).

Advertisement taken as best evidence of intentions of fund use. - Advertisement, a copy of which was attached to a petition as an exhibit, was the best evidence of the intention of the school board with respect to the use of the bond funds. In the absence of allegations of facts showing that the board had a secret, undisclosed intention to use the funds for some purpose other than that indicated by the advertisement or facts showing the deliberate perpetration of a fraud on the voters by the board, this advertisement must be taken as the best evidence of the board's intention with respect to the use of these funds. Miles v. State, 96 Ga. App. 610, 101 S.E.2d 173 (1957).

Special and General Laws

Local Act prescribing different manner of election is void as conflicting with general law. County of Dougherty v. Boyt, 71 Ga. 484 (1883).

Special law not void when the law merely prescribes additional requirements. - Special law which is void is one in conflict with a general law, and not one in harmony with the special and prescribing additional matters in regard to the election not in conflict with the general law. A special law providing that notice be published in an official gazette is construed in regard as to the general law as to what notice should contain. Farmer v. Mayor of Thomson, 133 Ga. 94, 65 S.E. 180 (1909).

Election under local Act must follow section. - Election under local Act making provision that in case of a school district the board of trustees of that district shall call the election on the question of whether the trustees shall incur a bonded debt to build and equip a schoolhouse must be concluded as provided by former Civil Code 1910, § 440 et seq. (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-82-1 et seq.). Jennings v. New Bronwood Sch. Dist., 156 Ga. 15, 118 S.E. 560 (1923).

Local law concerning registration applies only to elections specified. - Local law for the registration of voters in a given county which declares it unlawful to vote at any election without having first registered, and then proceeds to require registration biennially in those years in which elections are held for Governor, members of Congress and of the General Assembly applies only to elections for the officers designated, leaving the general law to operate upon elections under this section. Kaigler v. Roberts, 89 Ga. 476, 15 S.E. 542 (1892).

Local Act concerning registration only for election of officers. - When an Act contemplates a system of registration for only one election annually, and consequently that system is confined to the election of municipal officers at an election held to determine the question of issuing bonds, there is no statutory requirement upon the municipal authorities to order registration as a preliminary to this election. Howell v. Mayor of Athens, 91 Ga. 139, 16 S.E. 966 (1893).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

County school bond referendum. - County school board is empowered to authorize the calling of a school bond referendum which the county election superintendent shall then call by publishing the appropriate notice. 1985 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 85-18.

Bond referendum may be held on date of presidential preference primary, but the bond referendum should be placed on a separate ballot so that voters need not request a party ballot to vote only in the referendum. 1975 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 75-132.

Appropriate use of bond proceeds and savings generated by bond refundings. - Georgia Constitution and Georgia statutes do not provide any latitude to use bond proceeds for additional capital expenditures whether or not the proceeds are spent on projects which may have been approved by the voters at the time of the original bond referendum. Accordingly, all proceeds generated at closing of the refunding issue should be spent on the costs of the refunding or used to pay principal, interest, and premiums on the refunded debt. Furthermore, a new tax levy appropriately sized to retire the new refunding bonds should be provided for prior to issuance of the refunding bonds. If any excess proceeds result from the new tax levy, such excess proceeds shall not be available for transfer to capital projects until all refundings are repaid. 1994 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 94-8.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, §§ 113 et seq., 126 et seq., 142.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 354 et seq. 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2145 et seq.

ALR. - Change in law as to municipal bonds as affecting bonds previously authorized or voted, but not issued, 19 A.L.R. 1055.

Estoppel to deny validity of municipal bonds issued under an unconstitutional statute, 37 A.L.R. 1310.

Sale of municipal or other public bonds at less than par or face value, 91 A.L.R. 7; 162 A.L.R. 396.

Effect of inclusion in call for election, or in proposal for bond issue submitted to people, of unauthorized method of payment or retirement, 93 A.L.R. 362.

Funding or refunding obligations as subject to conditions respecting limitation of indebtedness or approval by voters, 97 A.L.R. 442.

Mistake, ambiguity, or omission in statement as to indebtedness, in call for election or proposal for bond issue, as affecting validity of election or bonds issued pursuant thereto, 116 A.L.R. 1258.

Statement regarding cost of proposed public improvement in ballot for special election in that regard, 117 A.L.R. 892.

Power and discretion of officer or board authorized to issue bonds of governmental unit as regards terms or conditions to be included therein, 119 A.L.R. 190.

Rights and obligations arising out of bid for municipal bond issue, 139 A.L.R. 1047.

Constitutional or statutory requirement of prior approval by electors of issuance of bonds or incurring of indebtedness, by municipality, county, or state, as applicable to bonds or other instruments not creating indebtedness, 146 A.L.R. 604.

Validity, within authorized debt, tax, or voted limit, of bond issue in excess of amount permitted by law, 175 A.L.R. 823.

Validity of submission of proposition to voters at bond election as affected by inclusion of several structures or units, 4 A.L.R.2d 617.

Validity of municipal bond issue as against owners of property annexation of which to municipality became effective after date of election at which issue was approved by voters, 10 A.L.R.2d 559.

36-82-2. Voting in election for bonded debt; returns and declaration of election result.

Statute text

The election provided for in Code Section 36-82-1 shall be held at all the voting or election precincts within the limits of the county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision and shall be held by the same persons, in the same manner, and under the same rules and regulations that elections for officers of the county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision are held. The returns shall be made to the officers calling or ordering the election. Such officers, in the presence of and together with the several managers, who shall bring up the returns, shall consolidate the returns and declare the result.

History

(Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 40, § 2; Code 1882, § 508j; Civil Code 1895, § 378; Civil Code 1910, § 441; Code 1933, § 87-202.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Independent issues cannot be submitted as single question. - When several distinct and independent propositions for the issuing of bonds by a municipality are submitted to the qualified voters of a town or city, provision should be made in the submission for a separate vote upon each. They cannot be lawfully combined and submitted to the voters as a single question. Rea v. City of LaFayette, 130 Ga. 771, 61 S.E. 707 (1908).

When contract entered into was submitted with other distinct propositions to the voters in an unauthorized manner, the contract may be declared void at the instance of the city. Americus Ry. & Light Co. v. Mayor of Americus, 136 Ga. 25, 70 S.E. 578 (1911).

Question of establishing school and incurring debt submitted at same time. - Question of establishing and maintaining school by local taxation and of authorizing town to incur a debt by issuing bonds for purpose of purchasing school property may be submitted to the qualified voters of the town at one and the same election, if the Act passed for this purpose be so framed as to accomplish this end. Brand v. Town of Lawrenceville, 104 Ga. 486, 30 S.E. 954 (1898).

Issue foreign to the matter of debt cannot be submitted to voters with a question of creating the debt, although the question as to the establishment of the enterprise for which the debt is to be incurred may be submitted with the question of incurring the debt. Cain v. Smith, 117 Ga. 902, 44 S.E. 5 (1903).

Joint canvass of returns by mayor, councilmen, and managers. - When on the day succeeding the election the mayor and councilmen, duly assembled, called into the meeting the managers of the election and jointly with them canvassed the returns and declared the result of the election, and in pursuance of such Act the mayor and councilmen passed a resolution reciting the declaration of the result in the manner indicated, this was a sufficient compliance with this section in regard to a joint declaration of the result of such election, and, consequently, a copy of the resolution was admissible upon proceedings to validate the bonds. Sewell v. City of Tallapoosa, 145 Ga. 19, 88 S.E. 577 (1916).

Irregularity in registering voters. - If there was some irregularity in the manner of registering a few voters, but it did not appear that such persons voted in the election, or that the persons were in fact not qualified to register, or that such irregularity affected the result, this furnished no cause for declaring the election void, and refusing to validate bonds authorized thereby. Brumby v. City of Marietta, 132 Ga. 408, 64 S.E. 321 (1909).

Violation of directory provisions of city charter concerning influencing voters. - Violation of directory provisions of a city charter (concerning influencing voters) by some persons and a failure to enforce them by the election managers did not operate to invalidate the entire bond election, it not appearing that the result would have been otherwise had there been a compliance with such provisions. Brumby v. City of Marietta, 132 Ga. 408, 64 S.E. 321 (1909).

Consolidated returns prima facie correct. - When the duly elected managers of a municipal election held in a city, for the purpose of determining whether or not bonds should be issued for municipal purposes, submitted the consolidated returns to the mayor and general council of such city, "and consolidated and the result declared," showing that the election resulted in favor of bonds, such consolidation was prima facie correct. Brown v. City of Atlanta, 152 Ga. 283, 109 S.E. 666 (1921).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Bond elections must be held in strict conformity with laws governing the elections. 1962 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 194.

Election concurrent with general election. - School bond election called by county board of education may be held concurrently with general election. 1965 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 65-9.

County superintendent of elections is proper person to conduct a school bond referendum and should certify the returns to the county board of education. 1985 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 85-18.

Bond referendum may be held on date of presidential preference primary, but the bond referendum should be placed on a separate ballot that voters need not request a party ballot to vote only in the referendum. 1975 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 75-132.

Ballots in school bond elections shall be furnished and election managers appointed by county board of education. 1950-51 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 44.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, § 133 et seq.

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2145 et seq.

ALR. - Estoppel to deny validity of municipal bonds issued under an unconstitutional statute, 37 A.L.R. 1310.

36-82-3. Issuance of bonds upon favorable election vote; ordinance or resolution authorizing refunding bonds; issuance, content, and form of refunding bonds.

Statute text

(a) When notice has been given and the election has been held, in accordance with Code Section 36-82-2, if the requisite majority of those qualified voters of the county, municipality, or political subdivision voting at the election vote for bonds, then the authority to issue the bonds in accordance with Article IX, Section V, Paragraph I or II of the Constitution of Georgia is given to the proper officers of the county, municipality, or political subdivision.

(b) The ordinance or resolution of the governing body of the county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state authorizing the issuance of general obligation refunding bonds in accordance with the terms and conditions of subsection (f) of Code Section 36-82-1 may be adopted at a regular or special meeting by a majority of the members of the governing body and, unless otherwise provided therein, such resolution or ordinance shall take effect immediately and need not be laid over or published or posted.

(c) General obligation refunding bonds may be issued in one or more series; may bear such date or dates; may mature at such time or times, and bear interest at such rate or rates per annum, payable at such time or times, subject to the limitations contained in subsection (f) of Code Section 36-82-1, pertaining to the final maturity date and maximum interest rate for such refunding bonds; may be payable in such medium of payment at such place or places; may be in such denomination or denominations; may be in such form, either coupon or registered; may carry such registration, conversion, and exchangeability privileges; may be subject to such terms of redemption, with or without a premium; may be executed in such manner; and may contain such terms, covenants, and conditions as the ordinance or resolution authorizing the issuance of such refunding bonds may provide. All general obligation refunding bonds issued under this article bearing the signature of officers in office on the date of the signing thereof shall be valid and binding, notwithstanding that before delivery thereof and payment therefor such officers whose signatures appear thereon shall have ceased to be officers of the governmental body issuing the bonds. Pending the preparation of the definitive bonds, interim receipts, in such form and with such provisions as the governing body may determine, may be issued to the purchaser or purchasers of bonds to be issued under this article. Such refunding bonds and interim receipts shall be negotiable for all purposes. Such refunding bonds shall be and are declared to be nontaxable for any and all purposes.

History

(Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 40, § 3; Code 1882, § 508k; Civil Code 1895, § 379; Civil Code 1910, § 442; Code 1933, § 87-203; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 57; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1362, § 2.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1984, p. 1362, § 8, not codified by the General Assembly, provided: "The provisions of this Act [which amended this Code section] shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof, and insofar as the provisions of this Act may be inconsistent with the provisions of the Georgia Constitution under circumstances where the General Assembly has been granted the power by law to enlarge or restrict such provisions of the Constitution or the provisions of any law, including any general, local, or special Act of the General Assembly creating or activating any municipality, this Act shall control."

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Authority to issue bonds. - Former Civil Code 1910, § 442 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-82-3) gave express authority to issue bonds when the notice required by former Civil Code 1910, § 440 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-82-1) was given and the election held in accordance with former Civil Code 1910, § 441 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-82-2). Cowart v. City of Waycross, 159 Ga. 589, 126 S.E. 476 (1925).

This section must be given effect, subject to the change as made by Ga. Const. 1945, Art. VII, Sec. VII, Para. V (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. VI, Para. I), in reference to the proportion of qualified voters necessary to authorize a bond issue; and no further enabling Act is necessary. McKnight v. City of Decatur, 200 Ga. 611, 37 S.E.2d 915 (1946).

County may issue bonds only when Constitution and laws complied with. - County may issue bonds to be paid for with funds derived from public taxation, and procure a judgment of the court confirming and validating the bonds, only when the Constitution and laws of the state have been fully complied with. Richter v. Chatham County, 146 Ga. 218, 91 S.E. 35 (1916).

Provision for annual tax must be made before bonds sold. - After the bonds have been validated, a provision for an annual tax must be made before the bonds can be sold and the debt be thereby actually incurred. Woodall v. Town of Adel, 122 Ga. 301, 50 S.E. 102 (1905); Oliver v. City of Elberton, 124 Ga. 64, 52 S.E. 15 (1905).

Past indebtedness. - Voters cannot authorize a bond issued for past indebtedness of a municipality. The voters must pass on the debt to be incurred. Mayor of Macon v. Jones, 122 Ga. 455, 50 S.E. 340 (1905).

Bonds may be payable in gold or lawful money. - It is lawful to make the proposed bonds "payable in gold, or lawful money of the United States, at the option of the holder." Heilbron v. Mayor of Cuthbert, 96 Ga. 312, 23 S.E. 206 (1895).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

School bond issue requires assent consisting of simply majority of those qualified voters in school bond election. 1963-65 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 769.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, §§ 139 et seq., 164.

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2153 et seq.

ALR. - Estoppel to deny validity of municipal bonds issued under an unconstitutional statute, 37 A.L.R. 1310.

Negotiability of municipal bonds as affected by reference to fund from which they are to be paid, 42 A.L.R. 1027.

Right to call governmental bonds in advance of their maturity, 109 A.L.R. 988.

Effect of delay after authorization by voters on power of governmental unit to issue bonds, 135 A.L.R. 768.

Validity, within authorized debt, tax, or voted limit, of bond issue in excess of amount permitted by law, 175 A.L.R. 823.

Rescission of vote authorizing school district or other municipal bond issue, expenditure, or tax, 68 A.L.R.2d 1041.

36-82-4. Action for collection of bonds by holders.

Statute text

When the bonds become due, the owners thereof, if necessary, may enforce their collection by action in the proper court.

History

(Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 40, § 5; Code 1882, § 508m; Civil Code 1895, § 381; Civil Code 1910, § 444; Code 1933, § 87-205.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Promissory note given by municipal corporation is invalid even in the hands of a bona fide endorsee for value before the note became due and although all but one of the notes had been paid this does not prevent the corporation from setting up the illegality of the contract in defense to a suit on the note. Town of Wadley v. Lancaster, 124 Ga. 354, 52 S.E. 335 (1905).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, §§ 309, 382, 394.

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2203 et seq.

ALR. - Negotiability of municipal bonds as affected by reference to fund from which they are to be paid, 42 A.L.R. 1027.

Priority or preference as between different issues of bonds of municipalities or political subdivisions, absent express provisions in that regard, 108 A.L.R. 1018.

When limitations begin to run against actions on public securities or obligations to be paid out of special or particular fund, 50 A.L.R.2d 271.

36-82-4.1. Advertisement of bond elections in counties having population of 400,000 to 500,000; use of bond funds.

Statute text

(a) In addition to the requirements of Code Sections 36-82-1 through 36-82-4 governing elections for the issuance of bonds, in all counties of this state having a population of not less than 400,000 nor more than 500,000 according to the United States decennial census of 1990 or any future such census, every legal advertisement of a bond election shall contain a reference that any brochures, listings, or other advertisements issued by the governing body in such counties, or by any other person, firm, corporation, or association with the knowledge and consent of the governing body, shall be deemed to be a statement of intention of the governing body concerning the use of the bond funds; and such statement of intention shall be binding on the governing body and shall limit the expenditure of any such bond funds to the purpose specified in such statement of intention, unless the governing body uses such bond funds for the retirement of bonded indebtedness in the manner provided by subsection (b) of this Code section. Such statement of intention shall also be set forth in the resolution pursuant to which such bonds are issued.

(b) The governing body in the counties specified in subsection (a) of this Code section may, by a two-thirds' vote, declare any project which has been proposed pursuant to a statement of intention provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section to be unnecessary. In that event, the governing body shall use such bond funds for the payment of all or any part of the principal and interest on any bonded indebtedness of such county then outstanding.

(c) In the counties specified in subsection (a) of this Code section, interest received from bond funds which have been invested and surpluses from the overestimated projects shall be used first to complete underestimated projects; and all remaining funds received from interest and overestimated projects shall be used for other projects or improvements which the governing body in such counties may deem necessary and which are encompassed within the language of the statement of purpose in the election notice. Any meetings of any governing bodies at which any bond fund allocation is made shall be open to the public. Such meetings shall be announced to the news media in advance and shall be open to the news media.

(d) In the counties specified in subsection (a) of this Code section, 90 percent of the net proceeds received from sale of the bonds less:

(1) Amounts allocated to the payment of bond issuance expenses;

(2) Amounts allocated for purchase of furnishings and equipment;

(3) Amounts allocated for contingencies; and

(4) Amounts allocated for work to be performed by employees of the issuing entity and materials and equipment therefor

shall be obligated for payment pursuant to a contract or contracts within 36 months from the date of issuance and delivery of such bonds. The remaining bond proceeds shall either be obligated pursuant to a contract or contracts or actually expended within 48 months from the date of issuance and delivery of such bonds. Any bond proceeds not expended or obligated within 48 months from the date of issuance and delivery of such bonds shall be paid to the sinking fund for the retirement of the bonds issued. For purposes of this subsection, land which is being acquired through condemnation proceedings shall be considered obligated for payment pursuant to a contract in an amount equal to the sum of moneys deposited with the court pursuant to a special master or other appropriate judicial proceedings. The provisions of this subsection shall apply to all general obligation bonds issued and delivered on or after December 1, 1986.

History

(Code 1933, § 87-201.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1439, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1921, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1232, § 1.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, a colon was added at the end of the introductory paragraph of subsection (d).

36-82-4.2. Expenditure of bond funds for purposes other than stated in public bond notice.

Statute text

(a) When, subsequent to the issuance of any bonds pursuant to the provisions of this article, the governing authority of any county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision adopts by a two-thirds' majority vote a resolution declaring that:

(1) A portion of the bond funds remains after the purpose stated in the notice required by subsection (b) of Code Section 36-82-1 has been achieved or accomplished;

(2) The purpose stated in such notice is no longer necessary; or

(3) Circumstances have changed such that the expenditure of all or part of such bond funds is no longer practicable or feasible,

the governing authority shall be authorized to expend such bond funds, including interest, for purposes of a nature substantially similar to the purpose stated in such notice or to reduce the bonded indebtedness of the county, municipality, or political subdivision.

(b) Not sooner than ten days prior to expending bond funds as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, the governing authority shall cause to be published once in the official county organ a copy of the resolution adopted pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, which resolution shall set forth the reason the bond funds were not expended for the original purpose and shall state the purpose for which such funds will be expended. In addition, the governing authorities shall cause a copy of such resolution to be sent by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to any trustee for bondholders or other paying agent.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-4.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1441, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment of this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Construction of school administration, maintenance, and storage facilities. - Proceeds of general obligation bonds issued under O.C.G.A. §§ 20-2-430 and 20-2-431 may not be used for school administration, maintenance, and storage facilities, but bonds may be issued for such purposes upon compliance by the county school board with the notice and purpose requirements set forth in O.C.G.A. Ch. 82, T. 36. 1998 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 98-12.

36-82-5. Destruction of unsold bonds.

Statute text

When any county, municipality, or political subdivision of this state has issued bonds under the authority of Article IX, Section V, Paragraph I, II, or III of the Constitution of Georgia and laws passed in pursuance thereof and when, after the bond issue is authorized and the bonds are printed, any of the bonds authorized and printed are not sold for any reason, the governing authorities of the county, municipality, or political subdivision may destroy the unsold bonds in the manner and under the conditions set out in Code Section 36-82-6.

History

(Ga. L. 1941, p. 426, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 57; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1362, § 3.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1984, p. 1362, § 8, not codified by the General Assembly, provided: "The provisions of this Act [which amended this Code section] shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof, and insofar as the provisions of this Act may be inconsistent with the provisions of the Georgia Constitution under circumstances where the General Assembly has been granted the power by law to enlarge or restrict such provisions of the Constitution or the provisions of any law, including any general, local, or special Act of the General Assembly creating or activating any municipality, this Act shall control."

36-82-6. Notice, hearing, order of court, and affidavit of two disinterested witnesses as to destruction of bonds; compensation of witnesses; payment of costs of proceedings.

Statute text

(a) The governing authorities of the county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision shall publish a notice, once a week for four consecutive weeks, in the newspaper in which county advertisements are usually published in the county or in the county in which the municipal corporation or political subdivision is located. The notice shall indicate that the unsold bonds will be destroyed at the time and at the place in the county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision stated in the notice.

(b) If no objection is filed by a taxpayer of the county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision with the clerk of the superior court of the county or of the county in which the municipal corporation or political division is located, at least five days before the date stated in the notice, or if such objection is filed and the judge of the superior court, after hearing, determines the objection to be without merit, the judge of the superior court shall order the unsold bonds destroyed by fire at the time and place stated in the notice or at the time and place stated in the order of the court.

(c) The judge shall also name two disinterested witnesses, who are neither officers nor employees of the county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision, to attend the destruction of the bonds, whose affidavits, filed with the clerk of the superior court, shall be prima-facie evidence that the bonds have been destroyed. The affidavits of the witnesses shall be preserved as records of the office of the clerk of the superior court. The witnesses shall be compensated for their services in the amount of $5.00 each.

(d) All costs of such proceedings shall be paid by the county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision, except where an objection filed is determined to be without merit, in which case costs of the pleadings, hearings, and judgment on the objection shall be taxed against the person objecting.

History

(Ga. L. 1941, p. 426, § 2.)

36-82-7. Authorized investments for bond proceeds.

Statute text

The proceeds of any bonds issued by any county, municipal corporation, school district, or other political subdivision of this state or any portion thereof or any authority or other public body corporate and politic created under the Constitution or laws of this state may, from time to time, be placed for investment and reinvestment in the local government investment pool created in Chapter 83 of this title by the governing authorities of the county, municipal corporation, school district, political subdivision, authority, or body or be invested and reinvested by the governing authorities of the county, municipal corporation, school district, political subdivision, authority, or body in the following securities, and no others:

(1) Bonds or obligations of such county, municipal corporation, school district, political subdivision, authority, or body or bonds or obligations of this state or other states or of other counties, municipal corporations, and political subdivisions of this state;

(2) Bonds or other obligations of the United States or of subsidiary corporations of the United States government which are fully guaranteed by such government;

(3) Obligations of and obligations guaranteed by agencies or instrumentalities of the United States government, including those issued by the Federal Land Bank, Federal Home Loan Bank, Federal Intermediate Credit Bank, Bank for Cooperatives, and any other such agency or instrumentality now or hereafter in existence; provided, however, that all such obligations shall have a current credit rating from a nationally recognized rating service of at least one of the three highest rating categories available and have a nationally recognized market;

(4) Bonds or other obligations issued by any public housing agency or municipal corporation in the United States, which such bonds or obligations are fully secured as to the payment of both principal and interest by a pledge of annual contributions under an annual contributions contract or contracts with the United States government, or project notes issued by any public housing agency, urban renewal agency, or municipal corporation in the United States which are fully secured as to payment of both principal and interest by a requisition, loan, or payment agreement with the United States government;

(5) Certificates of deposit of national or state banks located within this state which have deposits insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and certificates of deposit of federal savings and loan associations and state building and loan or savings and loan associations located within this state which have deposits insured by the Savings Association Insurance Fund of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the Georgia Credit Union Deposit Insurance Corporation, including the certificates of deposit of any bank, savings and loan association, or building and loan association acting as depository, custodian, or trustee for any such bond proceeds. The portion of such certificates of deposit in excess of the amount insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the Savings Association Insurance Fund of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or the Georgia Credit Union Deposit Insurance Corporation, if any, shall be secured by deposit, with the Federal Reserve Bank of Atlanta, Georgia, or with any national or state bank or federal savings and loan association or state building and loan or savings and loan association located within this state or with a trust office within this state, of one or more of the following securities in an aggregate principal amount equal at least to the amount of such excess: direct and general obligations of this state or other states or of any county or municipal corporation in this state, obligations of the United States or subsidiary corporations included in paragraph (2) of this Code section, obligations of the agencies and instrumentalities of the United States government included in paragraph (3) of this Code section, or bonds, obligations, or project notes of public housing agencies, urban renewal agencies, or municipalities included in paragraph (4) of this Code section;

(6) Securities of or other interests in any no-load, open-end management type investment company or investment trust registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as from time to time amended, or any common trust fund maintained by any bank or trust company which holds such proceeds as trustee or by an affiliate thereof so long as:

(A) The portfolio of such investment company or investment trust or common trust fund is limited to the obligations referenced in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this Code section and repurchase agreements fully collateralized by any such obligations;

(B) Such investment company or investment trust or common trust fund takes delivery of such collateral either directly or through an authorized custodian;

(C) Such investment company or investment trust or common trust fund is managed so as to maintain its shares at a constant net asset value; and

(D) Securities of or other interests in such investment company or investment trust or common trust fund are purchased and redeemed only through the use of national or state banks having corporate trust powers and located within this state; and

(7) Interest-bearing time deposits, repurchase agreements, reverse repurchase agreements, rate guarantee agreements, or other similar banking arrangements with a bank or trust company having capital and surplus aggregating at least $50 million or with any government bond dealer reporting to, trading with, and recognized as a primary dealer by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York having capital aggregating at least $50 million or with any corporation which is subject to registration with the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System pursuant to the requirements of the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, provided that each such interest-bearing time deposit, repurchase agreement, reverse repurchase agreement, rate guarantee agreement, or other similar banking arrangement shall permit the moneys so placed to be available for use at the time provided with respect to the investment or reinvestment of such moneys.
